Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-648
Money from special assessments; how used.

All money received from special assessments by a city of the first class may be applied to pay for the improvement for which assessed, or applied to reimburse the fund of the city from which the cost of the improvement may have been made.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 79, p. 289;

Laws 1903, c. 19, § 15, p. 245;

R.S.1913, § 4940;

C.S.1922, § 4108;

C.S.1929, § 16-637;

R.S.1943, § 16-648;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 50.